Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-927
County board; limitation on powers; contract with other districts.

The county board shall not set up any drainage improvement project within the boundaries of any drainage district organized under Chapter 31, article 3 or 4, or sanitary districts organized under Chapter 31, article 5 or 7, but may have authority to contract with any such district with reference to drainage within such district.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 27, p. 492.